Louisiana, session 2026, HB794.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part I of Chapter 3-G of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 40:600.121 through 600.128, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART I. THE LOUISIANA FIRST-GENERATION HOMEBUYER ASSISTANCE
ACT
§600.121. Short title; purpose
A. This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana
First-Generation Homebuyer Assistance Act."
B. The purpose of this Part is to expand homeownership in communities
historically excluded from wealth-building through homeownership by providing
down payment and closing cost assistance to first-generation homebuyers.
§600.122. Definitions
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1290 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 794
For the purposes of this Part, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Area median income" or "AMI" means the median household income
for the applicable metropolitan statistical area or rural area as determined annually
by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(2) "Corporation" means the Louisiana Housing Corporation.
(3) "First-generation homebuyer" means an individual who is one of the
following:
(a) Has not owned a primary residence at any time during the three years
preceding the date of application and whose parents or legal guardians did not own
a primary residence during the applicant's childhood, prior to age eighteen, as
documented by the applicant.
(b) Grew up in the foster care system or without permanent housing during
childhood, regardless of parental homeownership status.
(4) "Program" means the Louisiana First-Generation Homebuyer Assistance
Program.
(5) "Qualified mortgage" means a mortgage loan made by a participating
lender that meets the corporation's underwriting guidelines, does not involve a
balloon payment in the first ten years, and bears an interest rate no more than two
percentage points above the average prime offer rate for comparable transactions.
(6) "Targeted census tract" means a census tract identified by the corporation
as having a homeownership rate at least twenty percentage points below the
statewide average homeownership rate, based on the most recent American
Community Survey data.
§600.123. Program establishment; funding
A. There is hereby established the Louisiana First-Generation Homebuyer
Assistance Program, to be administered by the corporation.
B. The program shall be funded by:
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1290 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 794
(1) An initial appropriation of fifteen million dollars from the Louisiana
Capital Outlay Fund.
(2) Repayments of assistance upon sale, refinance, or transfer of the assisted
property.
(3) Federal HOME Investment Partnerships Program funds and Community
Development Block Grant funds allocated for homeownership assistance.
(4) Private contributions and foundation grants.
§600.124. Eligibility requirements
A. To qualify for assistance under this program, an applicant shall do all of
the following:
(1) Meet the definition of first-generation homebuyer pursuant to R.S.
40:600.122(3).
(2) Have a household income that does not exceed one hundred twenty
percent of the applicable AMI, provided that at least fifty percent of annual program
funds are reserved for applicants at or below eighty percent of AMI.
(3) Demonstrate the ability to obtain and repay a qualified mortgage for the
purchase of a primary residence in this state.
(4) Complete a HUD-approved homebuyer education course of not fewer
than eight hours prior to closing.
(5) Agree to occupy the purchased home as their primary residence for a
period of at least five years.
(6) Not own any other real property at the time of closing.
B. Priority shall be given to applicants purchasing homes in targeted census
tracts as defined in R.S. 40:600.122(5).
§600.125. Assistance terms; recapture provisions
A. Assistance under this program shall be provided in the form of a soft
second mortgage as follows:
(1) Maximum assistance: Twenty-five thousand dollars per qualified buyer
or the actual down payment and closing costs, whichever is less.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1290 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 794
(2) The assistance shall be structured as a deferred, forgivable loan with a
zero percent interest rate.
(3) The loan shall be forgiven in full if the recipient occupies the property
as their primary residence for the full five-year period.
(4) If the recipient sells, refinances, or transfers the property before the end
of the five-year occupancy period, the assistance shall be repaid to the program on
a pro-rated basis: one-fifth of the outstanding balance forgiven for each complete
year of occupancy.
B. The assistance outlined in this Section may be used for any of the
following:
(1) A down payment on the purchase of a primary residence.
(2) Mortgage loan closing costs.
(3) Pre-paid homeowner's insurance and property taxes at closing.
(4) Costs of required home inspections.
§600.126. Participating lenders
The corporation shall certify participating lenders and shall require them to
do all of the following:
(1) Commit to offering qualified mortgage products to program applicants.
(2) Ensure loan officers who work with program applicants complete fair
lending and implicit bias training annually.
(3) Submit quarterly data on applications, approvals, and denials by
applicant race, income, and census tract.
(4) Maintain a commitment to community outreach in targeted census tracts.
§600.127. Marketing and outreach
A. The corporation shall implement a proactive outreach campaign
specifically targeting communities with historically low homeownership rates,
including African American, Hispanic, and rural communities.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1290 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 794
B. Outreach shall include partnerships with churches, community
organizations, Historically Black Colleges and Universities, employers, and social
service agencies.
C. All program materials shall be available in English and Spanish at a
minimum.
§600.128. Annual reporting
The corporation shall publish an annual report detailing the number of
applicants, awards, denials, and completed closings; the geographic and demographic
breakdown of recipients; the total amount disbursed and recaptured; and the impact
on homeownership rates in targeted census tracts over time.